Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER
88E]

DEFERRED
COMPENSATION PLAN

Section

88E-1 Definitions

88E-2 State deferred compensation plan

88E-3 Board of trustees

88E-4 Composition of the board of trustees

88E-5 Appointment and terms

88E-6 Compensation and expenses

88E-7 Legal advisor

88E-8 Deferred funds

88E-9 Investments

88E-10 Repealed

88E-11 Limitation on liability

88E-12 Deferred amounts as compensation

88E-13 Costs of the plan

88E-14 County deferred compensation plans

88E-15 Existing deferred compensation plans

Attorney General Opinions

Hawaii Public Procurement Code did not apply to board of
trustees' current administrator and investment-product-provider contracts
because they were entered into before Code's July 1, 1994 effective date.
The Code would apply to contracts entered into after that date if "public
funds" are used to fund them. Att. Gen. Op. 94-4.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next